Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 65 Continuing Education for Legislators

16-65-1.
Continuing education benefits for legislators.

Members of the general assembly shall be entitled to audit courses at state colleges and universities without the payment of tuition, fees, or charges. Admission into particular courses shall be limited to one course per semester per legislator and where space is available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 390, § 1.